Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 15 Emergency Management

30-15-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Rhode Island Emergency Management Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 2.

30-15-2.
Purposes of provisions.

The purposes of this chapter are:

To reduce vulnerability of people and communities of this state to damage, injury, and loss of life and property resulting from natural or man-made catastrophes, riots, or hostile military or paramilitary action or acts of bioterrorism;

To prepare for prompt and efficient rescue, care, and treatment of persons victimized or threatened by disaster;

To provide a setting conducive to the rapid and orderly start of restoration and rehabilitation of persons and property affected by disasters;

To clarify and strengthen the roles of the governor, state agencies, and local governments in prevention of, preparation for, and response to and recovery from disasters;

To authorize and provide for cooperation in disaster prevention, preparedness, response, and recovery;

To authorize and provide for coordination of activities relating to disaster prevention, preparedness, response, and recovery by agencies and officers of this state, and similar state-local, interstate, federal-state, and foreign activities in which the state and its political subdivisions may participate;

To provide a disaster management system embodying all four (4) phases of emergency management: mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery.

[Deleted by P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 2];

To prepare for emergency health threats, including those caused by acts of bioterrorism, that require the exercise of extraordinary government functions;

To provide the state with the ability to respond rapidly and effectively to potential or actual public health emergencies or disaster emergencies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 185, § 4; P.L. 2003, ch. 189, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 38.

30-15-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Bioterrorism” means the intentional use of any microorganism, virus, infectious substance or biological product that may be engineered as a result of biotechnology or any naturally occurring or bioengineered component of any such microorganism, virus, infectious substance, or biological product, to cause death, disease, or other biological malfunction in a human, an animal, a plant or other living organism;

“Disaster” means occurrence or imminent threat of widespread or severe damage, injury, or loss of life or property resulting from any natural or man-made cause, including, but not limited to:

Fire;

Flood;

Earthquake;

Wind, storm, wave action, oil spill, or other water contamination requiring emergency action to avert danger or damage;

Volcanic activity;

Epidemic;

Air contamination;

Blight;

Drought;

Infestation;

Explosion;

Riots;

Hostile military or paramilitary action;

Endangerment of the health, safety, or resources of the people of the state;

Acts of bioterrorism;

“Political subdivision” means any city or town in Rhode Island; and

“Unorganized militia” means all able-bodied persons between the ages of sixteen (16) and fifty (50) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 1974, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 185, § 4; P.L. 2003, ch. 189, § 4.

30-15-4.
Limitations.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed:

To interfere with the course or conduct of a labor dispute except that actions otherwise authorized by this chapter or other laws may be taken when necessary to forestall or mitigate imminent or existing danger to public health or safety;

To interfere with dissemination of news or comment on public affairs; but any communications facility or organization (including, but not limited to, radio or television stations, wire services, and newspapers) may be required to transmit or print public service messages furnishing information or instructions in connection with a disaster emergency;

To affect the jurisdiction or responsibilities of police forces, firefighting forces, or units of the armed forces of the United States, or of any personnel thereof, when on active duty; but state and local disaster emergency plans shall place reliance upon the forces available for performance of functions related to disaster emergencies; or

To limit, modify, or abridge the authority of the governor to proclaim martial law or exercise any other powers vested in the governor under the constitution, statutes, or common law of this state independent of, or in conjunction with, any provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2.

30-15-5.
Emergency management preparedness agency created — Personnel — Facilities.

There is hereby created within the executive department, the Rhode Island emergency management agency (hereinafter in this chapter called the “agency”), to be headed by a director, who shall be appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the governor and who shall be in the unclassified service.

The director may employ such technical, clerical, stenographic, and other personnel, all of whom shall be in the classified service, and may make such expenditures within the appropriation therefor, or from other funds made available for the purposes of this chapter, as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, consistent with other applicable provisions of law.

The agency may provide itself with appropriate office space, furniture, equipment, supplies, stationery, and printing.

The director, subject to the direction and control of the governor, shall be the head of the agency, and shall be responsible to the governor for carrying out the program for disaster preparedness of this state. The director shall coordinate the activities of all organizations for disasters within the state and shall maintain liaison with and cooperate with disaster agencies and organizations of other states and of the federal government. The director shall have such additional authority, duties, and responsibilities authorized by this chapter as may be prescribed by the governor.

Wherever in the general or public laws, or any rule or regulation, any reference to the “executive director” shall appear, it shall be deemed to mean and shall mean “the director.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, ch. 41, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 53, § 1.

30-15-6.
Advisory council.

There is hereby created the Rhode Island emergency management advisory council (hereinafter in this chapter called the “council”). The council will consist of thirty-eight (38) members as follows:

Twenty-three (23) ex officio members as follows:

The lieutenant governor or designee;

The adjutant general or designee;

The director of the department of administration or designee;

The director of the department of health or designee;

The director of transportation or designee;

The director of human services or designee;

The director of the department of public safety or designee;

The administrator of the division of public utilities and carriers or designee;

The director of the department of environmental management or designee;

The director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals or designee;

[Deleted by P.L. 2017, ch. 84, § 1 and P.L. 2017, ch. 86, § 1];

[Deleted by P.L. 2017, ch. 84, § 1 and P.L. 2017, ch. 86, § 1];

The chairperson of the governor’s commission on disabilities or designee;

The chairperson of the Rhode Island public transit authority or designee;

The executive director of the coastal resources management council or designee;

The executive director of the American Red Cross, Rhode Island chapter, or designee;

The director of the Rhode Island emergency management agency or designee;

The state court administrator or designee;

The executive director of the commission on the deaf and hard of hearing or designee;

The director of the Providence emergency management agency or designee;

The executive director of the E-911 emergency telephone system division or designee;

[Deleted by P.L. 2017, ch. 84, § 1 and P.L. 2017, ch. 86, § 1];

The secretary of the executive office of health and human services or designee;

The president of the Rhode Island Association of Emergency Managers or designee;

The president of the United Way of Rhode Island or designee; and

The executive director of the Rhode Island commission for national and community services or designee.

Fifteen (15) members appointed by, and serving at the pleasure of, the governor, as follows:

Two (2) members of the senate, recommended by the president of the senate, not more than one of whom shall be from the same political party;

Two (2) members of the house of representatives, recommended by the speaker of the house, not more than one of whom shall be from the same political party;

One representative of the gas and electric industry;

[Deleted by P.L. 2017, ch. 84, § 1 and P.L. 2017, ch. 86, § 1];

One representative of the telephone industry;

[Deleted by P.L. 2017, ch. 84, § 1 and P.L. 2017, ch. 86, § 1];

Two (2) representatives of the general public, one of whom shall have expertise in disaster preparedness;

One representative of the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns;

One representative of the media;

One representative of the water supply industry;

One representative of the healthcare industry;

One representative of the Rhode Island State Association of Firefighters;

One representative of the Rhode Island Association of Fire Chiefs; and

[Deleted by P.L. 2017, ch. 84, § 1 and P.L. 2017, ch. 86, § 1];

[Deleted by P.L. 2017, ch. 84, § 1 and P.L. 2017, ch. 86, § 1];

One representative of the Rhode Island Police Chiefs Association.

It shall be the duty of the council to advise the governor and the director of the Rhode Island emergency management agency on all matters pertaining to disaster preparedness. The lieutenant governor shall serve as chairperson of the council and the director of the Rhode Island emergency management agency shall serve as vice-chairperson. A quorum shall consist of twelve (12) members of the council. In providing advice to the governor and the director, the council shall, among other matters reasonably related to its authority, do the following:

Establish a regular meeting schedule and form subcommittees as may be appropriate;

Review emergency management plans and other matters as may be acted upon or otherwise provided for in this chapter;

Establish priorities and goals on emergency management matters on an annual basis;

Study emergency management plans in conjunction with the director of the Rhode Island emergency management agency, and otherwise conduct such other studies as may be deemed appropriate;

Review the coordination of the state’s emergency management programs with appropriate authorized agencies and conduct studies on the programs as may be necessary;

Review the plans and operations of the various cities and towns in disaster preparedness in conjunction with the director of the Rhode Island emergency management agency and his or her office as required or necessary; and

[Deleted by P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 2];

Provide an annual report on its activities in conjunction with the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 226, § 8; P.L. 1981, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 41, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 7; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 185, § 4; P.L. 2003, ch. 189, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 337, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 450, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 289, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 319, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 53, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 86, § 1.

30-15-7.
Governor’s general powers.

The governor shall be responsible for carrying out the provisions of this chapter and shall be primarily responsible for emergency management in the state. Aside from powers granted to the governor elsewhere, the governor is hereby specifically authorized to:

Issue executive orders, proclamations, and regulations and amend or rescind them. Executive orders, proclamations, and regulations, for the purposes of this chapter, have the force and effect of law;

Cooperate with the federal authorities and with the governors and/or officials of the other states in matters pertaining to the common disaster preparedness of the states and nation, and in exercising the powers under this chapter, the governor shall avoid duplications of, and conflicts with, the efforts of the federal authorities acting within their proper spheres;

Consider on a continuing basis steps that could be taken to prevent or reduce the harmful consequences of disasters. At the governor’s direction, and pursuant to any other authority they now have, state agencies, including, but not limited to, those that are or may be charged with responsibilities in connection with flood plain management, stream encroachment and flow regulation, weather modification, fire prevention and control, air quality, public works, land use and land-use planning, and construction standards, shall make studies of disaster-prevention-related matters. The governor, from time to time, shall make recommendations to the general assembly, local governments, and other appropriate public and private entities as may facilitate measures for mitigation of the harmful consequences of disasters;

Prepare a comprehensive plan and program for disasters (including response and recovery) in the state, the plan and program to be integrated into, and coordinated with, the response and disaster plans of other states to the fullest possible extent, and coordinate the preparation of plans and programs for disasters by the political subdivisions of the state, such plans to be integrated into, and coordinated with the state disaster plan and program to the fullest possible extent;

In accordance with the plans and programs for disasters in the state, procure supplies and equipment, to institute training programs and public information programs, and to take all other preparatory steps, including the partial or full mobilization of disaster organizations in advance of actual disaster, to ensure the furnishing of adequately trained and equipped forces of disaster personnel in time of need;

Delegate any administrative authority vested in the governor under this chapter and provide for the subsequent delegation of that authority; and

Do all other things necessary to ensure adequate preparation for disasters in the state, not inconsistent with other provisions of law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 38.

30-15-8.
Mobile support units.

The governor, or the governor’s duly designated representative, is authorized to create and establish any number of mobile support units that may be necessary to reinforce disaster organizations in stricken areas with due consideration of the plans of the federal government and of other states. Mobile support units shall be called to duty upon orders of the governor and shall perform their functions in any part of the state or, upon the conditions specified in this section, in other states.

Personnel of mobile support units while on duty, whether within or without the state, shall:

If they are employees of the state, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities and receive the compensation incidental to their employment;

If they are employees of a political subdivision of the state, and whether serving within or without the political subdivision, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities and receive the compensation incidental to their employment; and

If they are not employees of the state or a political subdivision thereof, be entitled to compensation by the state at a rate equivalent to the rate of compensation paid to jurors in state courts, and to the same rights and immunities as are provided by law for the employees of this state.

All personnel of mobile support units shall, while on duty, be subject to the operational control of the authority in charge of disaster activities in the area in which they are serving, and shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses as if they were temporary state employees.

The state shall reimburse a political subdivision for the compensation paid and actual and necessary travel, subsistence, and maintenance expenses of the employees of a political subdivision while serving as members of a mobile support unit; and for all payments for death, disability, or injury of those employees incurred in the course of such duty; and for all losses of, or damage to, supplies and equipment of such political subdivision resulting from the operation of that mobile support unit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 2.

30-15-9.
Governor’s responsibilities relating to disaster emergencies.

The governor shall be responsible for meeting the dangers to the state and people presented by disasters.

A state of emergency shall be declared by executive order or proclamation of the governor if he or she finds a disaster has occurred or that this occurrence, or the threat thereof, is imminent. The state of disaster emergency shall continue until the governor finds that the threat or danger has passed or the disaster has been dealt with to the extent that emergency conditions no longer exist and terminates the state of disaster emergency by executive order or proclamation, but no state of disaster emergency may continue for longer than thirty (30) days unless renewed by the governor. The general assembly, by concurrent resolution, may terminate a state of disaster emergency at any time. Thereupon, the governor shall issue an executive order or proclamation ending the state of disaster emergency and what actions are being taken to control the emergency and what action the public should take to protect themselves. All executive orders or proclamations issued under this subsection shall indicate the nature of the disaster, the area or areas threatened, and the conditions that have brought it about or that make possible termination of the state of disaster emergency. An executive order or proclamation shall be disseminated promptly by means calculated to bring its contents to the attention of the general public and, unless the circumstances attendant upon the disaster prevent or impede, promptly filed with the agency, the secretary of state, and the city and town clerks in the area to which it applies.

An executive order or proclamation of a state of disaster emergency, shall activate the state and local disaster emergency plans applicable to the political subdivision or area in question and shall be authority for the deployment and use of any forces to which the plan or plans apply and for the use or distribution of any supplies, equipment, and materials and facilities assembled, stockpiled, or arranged to be made available pursuant to this chapter or any other provision of law relating to disaster emergencies.

During the continuance of any state of disaster emergency the governor is commander-in-chief of the organized and unorganized militia and of all other forces available for emergency duty. To the greatest extent practicable, the governor shall delegate or assign command authority by prior arrangement embodied in appropriate executive orders or regulations, but nothing herein restricts the governor’s authority to do so by orders issued at the time of the disaster emergency.

In addition to any other powers conferred upon the governor by law, the governor may exercise the following powers, subject to the provisions of subsection (g) of this section, limited in scope and duration as is reasonably necessary for emergency response:

Suspend the provisions of any regulatory statute prescribing the procedures for conduct of state business, or the orders, rules, or regulations of any state agency, if strict compliance with the provisions of any statute, order, rule, or regulation would in any way prevent, hinder, or delay necessary action in coping with the emergency, provided that the suspension of any statute, order, rule or regulation will be limited in duration and scope to the emergency action requiring said suspension;

Utilize all available resources of the state government as reasonably necessary to cope with the disaster emergency and of each political subdivision of the state;

Transfer the direction, personnel, or functions of state departments and agencies or units thereof for the purpose of performing or facilitating emergency services;

Subject to any applicable requirements for compensation under §

30-15-11

, commandeer or utilize any private property if the governor finds this necessary to cope with the disaster emergency;

Direct and compel the evacuation of all or part of the population from any stricken or threatened area within the state if the governor deems this action necessary for the preservation of life or other disaster mitigation, response, or recovery;

Prescribe routes, modes of transportation, and destinations in connection with evacuation;

Control ingress and egress to and from a high risk area, the movement of persons within the area, and the occupancy of premises therein;

Suspend or limit the sale, dispensing, or transportation of alcoholic beverages, firearms, explosives, and combustibles;

Make provision for the availability and use of temporary emergency shelter;

Make and promulgate such rules and regulations as the governor may deem advisable for the assigning, detailing, and making available for duty and use in any city or town of this state any of the personnel, apparatus, or equipment of any police or fire department of any other city or town, or of any volunteer fire company, or of any fire district, and that personnel shall have the same powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities as if performing their duties in the city or town in which they normally would be employed, but the personnel shall obey the orders of the police and fire authorities of the city or town to which assigned, detailed, or made available. When assigned, detailed, or made available as aforesaid, the city or town in which the police or firefighters shall perform outside duties shall provide them with subsistence or pay them a reasonable allowance therefor, and shall also be liable for any damage to the apparatus or equipment incurred while being so used; provided, however, that a city or town shall be reimbursed by the state out of the general fund of the state for all expenses incurred under the foregoing provisions of this subsection;

Designate as a special emergency health and sanitation area, any area within the state that has been seriously damaged by disaster, or in which the existence of any military, naval, or air establishment of the United States of America or of any industrial establishment constructed or enlarged for purposes of national defense, has caused an increase in the population of that area to such an extent as to produce unusual problems of health and sanitation. It is the duty of state health authorities and the local code enforcement officials to make and enforce rules and regulations designed to prevent the introduction of any contagious or infectious disease and to safeguard the public health within the area. The governor may promulgate and enforce additional rules and regulations for the protection of the public health within areas as may be necessary;

Whenever, in the governor’s opinion, due to a disaster there is liable to be a serious shortage in the supply of food, fuel, clothing, antitoxins, serums, immunizing agents, or any other pharmaceutical agents or medical supplies, or any other necessity of life or defense, and the federal authorities are not adequately dealing with the situation, promulgate such rules and regulations as he or she, from time to time, deems necessary to regulate the sale, purchase, or distribution of those necessities and to prohibit and prevent the wasting, secreting, hiding, or hoarding of, or profiteering from, those necessities; additionally, during a declared time of state or national emergency, no person, firm, or corporation shall increase the price of any item it sells or offers for sale at retail immediately prior to the proclamation of emergency or during the proclaimed state of emergency. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the fluctuation in the price of items sold at retail that occurs during the normal course of business. Any person, firm, or corporation who or that violates any provision of this subsection shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100);

Do all other things necessary to effectively cope with disasters in the state not inconsistent with other provisions of law;

Adopt and enforce measures to provide for the safe disposal of infectious waste as may be reasonable and necessary for emergency response due to a state disaster emergency. Such measures may include, but are not limited to, the collection, storage, handling, destruction, treatment, transportation, and disposal of infectious waste;

Adopt and enforce measures to provide for the safe disposal of corpses as may be reasonable and necessary for emergency response due to a state disaster emergency. Such measures may include, but are not limited to, the embalming, burial, cremation, interment, disinterment, transportation, and disposal of corpses; and

Compel a person to submit to a physical examination and/or testing as necessary to diagnose or treat the person. The medical examination and/or testing may be performed by any qualified person authorized by the department of health and must not be reasonably likely to result in serious harm to the affected individual. The medical examination and/or testing shall be performed immediately upon the order of the department of health without resort to judicial or quasi-judicial authority. If the department of health is uncertain whether a person who refuses to undergo medical examination and/or testing may have been exposed to an infectious disease or otherwise poses a danger to public health, the department of health may subject the individual to isolation or quarantine pursuant to §

23-8-4

.

Nothing contained herein shall be construed to limit or restrict the power of the general assembly to appropriate any federal funds received by the state of Rhode Island pursuant to §

35-4-22.1

.

Powers conferred upon the governor pursuant to the provisions of subsection (e) of this section for disaster emergency response shall not exceed a period of one hundred eighty (180) days from the date of the emergency order or proclamation of a state of disaster emergency, unless and until the general assembly extends the one hundred eighty (180) day period by concurrent resolution.

Nothing contained in subsection (g) of this section shall be construed to apply to the following executive orders issued by the governor that shall remain in effect and may be extended by further executive order up to, but not beyond, September 1, 2021:

20-06;

20-19;

20-37;

20-46 as amended by 21-60;

20-72;

21-26;

21-67; and

21-68, limited to paragraph 8.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 185, § 4; P.L. 2003, ch. 189, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 38; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 3, § 3, effective July 6, 2021.

30-15-10.
Financing — Disaster emergency funding board established.

It is the intent of the general assembly and declared to be the policy of the state that funds to meet disaster emergencies shall always be available.

A disaster emergency funding board is hereby established, composed of the president of the senate, the speaker of the house, and the chairpersons of the senate and house finance committees.

It is the legislative intent that the first recourse shall be to funds regularly appropriated to state and local agencies. If the governor finds that the demands placed upon these funds in coping with a particular disaster are unreasonably great, with the concurrence of the disaster emergency funding board, he or she may make funds available by transferring and expending moneys appropriated for other purposes or may borrow for a term not to exceed two (2) years from the United States government or any other private source.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit the governor’s authority to apply for, administer, and expend any grants, gifts, or payments, in aid of disaster prevention, preparedness, response, or recovery.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 61.

30-15-11.
Emergency claims commission.

There is hereby created an emergency claims commission, consisting of three (3) qualified electors of this state, who shall, if deemed necessary, within ten (10) days after the governor proclaims an emergency, be appointed by the presiding justice of the superior court. Any vacancy in the membership of the commission shall be filled immediately by the presiding justice. The presiding justice shall fix the per diem compensation of the members of the commission. The commission shall determine what sum will justly compensate the claimant for the property taken, and that determination shall be made in accordance with the procedure established by the majority of the justices of the superior court, which procedure shall be designed to secure the just, speedy, and inexpensive determination of claims for compensation. The commission may hire, and the state shall pay for, the services of any skilled and disinterested appraisers that the commission shall deem necessary to assist it in the performance of its duties. The clerk of the superior court for Providence county shall detail one of the assistant clerks and any clerical assistance that may be necessary to assist the commission in performing its duties, and when and if the commission so requests, the clerks of the superior courts for the other counties of the state shall furnish the commission any clerical assistance that it may require. The proper authorities shall provide the commission with suitable and convenient quarters in the courthouses of the state.

Whenever the governor takes possession of, or title to, any real or personal property pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, he or she shall immediately cause the owner and/or possessor of the property, referred to as the “claimant”, to be notified in any manner that the commission provides, and shall also cause a copy of the notice to be filed with the commission. If the claimant or the attorney general representing the state is not satisfied with the award made by the commission, he or she may appeal within thirty (30) days after the award to the superior court and the proceedings shall thereafter be conducted in the superior court in accordance with the guaranties of the constitution and any rules of procedure that a majority of the justices of the court may adopt. Review by the supreme court shall be available to the state and to the claimant in accordance with any rules that a majority of the justices of the supreme court may adopt provided a petition for review is filed in the office of the clerk of the supreme court within thirty (30) days after entry of the decision of the superior court. These proceedings shall have precedence on the calendars of the courts. All unappealed awards and final judgments entered against the state in all proceedings and the fees and expenses of the commission shall be paid by the general treasurer out of any money in the treasury appropriated for this purpose and/or any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, and this direction shall constitute an appropriation for the payment of the awards, judgments, fees, and expenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 2.

30-15-12.
Local emergency management.

Each city and town of the state shall establish, through local ordinance, a comparable agency, headed by a director, similar to the statewide disaster agency, with powers and duties within their respective jurisdictions similar to those of the agency. This agency shall be known as the “(here insert the name of the city or town) emergency management agency”. Local agencies shall cooperate with and assist the agency and shall perform such services as may be requested by it. Local agencies may act jointly with other such agencies.

The chief executive officer of each city or town has powers and duties with respect to emergency management within his or her city or town similar to those of the governor on the state level, not inconsistent with other provisions of law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 38.

30-15-13.
Local disaster emergencies.

A local disaster emergency may be declared only by the principal executive officer of a political subdivision. It shall not be continued or renewed for a period in excess of seven (7) days except by, or with the consent of, the governing board of the political subdivision. Any order or proclamation declaring, continuing, or terminating a local disaster emergency shall be given prompt and general publicity and shall be filed promptly with the city or town clerk.

The effect of a declaration of a local disaster emergency is to activate the mitigation response and recovery aspects of any and all applicable local disaster emergency plans and to authorize the furnishing of aid and assistance thereunder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 2.